Mississippi, session 2026, HB469.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 9-7-7, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: [Until January 1, 2027, this section shall read as follows:] 9-7-7.  (1)  There shall be four (4) judges for the First Circuit Court District. (2)  The four (4) judgeships shall be separate and distinct and denominated for purposes of appointment and election only as "Place One," "Place Two," "Place Three" and "Place Four."  The judge to fill Place One must reside in Alcorn, Prentiss or Tishomingo County.  The judges to fill Place Two and Place Three must reside in Itawamba, Lee, Monroe or Pontotoc County.  The judge to fill Place Four may be a resident of any county in the district. Election of the four (4) offices of judge shall be by election to be held in every county within the First Circuit Court District. [From and after January 1, 2027, this section shall read as follows:] 9-7-7.  (1)  There shall be  * * *four (4)five (5) judges for the First Circuit Court District. (2)  The * * *four (4) five (5) judgeships shall be separate and distinct and denominated for purposes of appointment and election only as "Place One," "Place Two," "Place Three" * * *and, "Place Four * * *." and "Place Five."  The judge to fill Place One shall be a resident of Alcorn, Prentiss or Tishomingo County.  The judges to fill Place Two and Place Three shall be residents of a county in the district.  The judges to fill Place Four and Place Five shall be a residents of Itawamba, Monroe or Pontotoc County.  Election of the * * *four (4) five (5) offices of judge shall be by election to be held in every county within the First Circuit Court District. SECTION 2.  Section 9-7-5, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 9-7-5.  The First Circuit Court District is composed of the following counties: (a)  Alcorn County; (b)  Itawamba County; (c)  Lee County; (d)  Monroe County; (e)  Pontotoc County; (f)  Prentiss County; and (g)  Tishomingo County. SECTION 3.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.